Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.100

Amendment of bylaws.

The bylaws adopted by the incorporators and approved by the director shall be the bylaws of the association. The members, at any meeting called for the purpose, may amend the bylaws of the association on a majority vote of the members present, in person or by proxy, or the directors at any regular or special meeting called under the provisions of RCW 33.16.090 may amend the bylaws of the association on a two-thirds majority vote of the directors. Amendments of the bylaws shall become effective after being adopted by the board or the members.

[ 1994 c 256 s 118; 1994 c 92 s 433; 1967 c 49 s 1; 1945 c 235 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-130. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 9, 10; 1890 p 56 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 433 and by 1994 c 256 s 118, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.